Florida, session 2026, HB171.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 683.338, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
683.338 Responsible Firearm Safety Awareness Month.—
(1) The Legislature designates the month of June as
"Responsible Firearm Safety Awareness Month" to recognize the
importance of safe and responsible firearm use and ownership,
while honoring the guarantees of the Second Amendment to the
United States Constitution and of s. 8, Art. I of the State
Constitution.
(2) The Department of Law Enforcement, local governments,
and other agencies and organizations are encouraged to sponsor
events that promote public awareness on the dangers of firearms
and educate the public through voluntary training and safety
demonstrations.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb171-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 171 2026
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb171-00